Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 26. Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission.

§ 33.2-2600.
Hampton Roads Transportation Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund for Planning District 23 to be known as the Hampton Roads Transportation Fund, referred to in this chapter as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All revenues dedicated to the Fund pursuant to §

58.1-638

and Chapter 22.1 (§

58.1-2291

et seq.) of Title 58.1 shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. The moneys deposited in the Fund shall be used solely for (i) new construction projects on new or existing highways, bridges, and tunnels in the localities comprising Planning District 23 as approved by the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission and (ii) administrative and operating expenses as specified in subsection B of §

33.2-2605

. The Commission shall give priority to those projects that are expected to provide the greatest impact on reducing congestion for the greatest number of citizens residing within Planning District 23 and shall ensure that the moneys shall be used for such construction projects.

The amounts dedicated to the Fund shall be deposited monthly by the Comptroller into the Fund and thereafter distributed to the Commission as soon as practicable for use in accordance with this chapter. If the Commission determines that such moneys distributed to it exceed the amount required to meet the current needs and demands to fund transportation projects pursuant to this chapter, the Commission may invest such excess moneys to the same extent and in the same manner as provided in subsection A of §

33.2-1525

for excess funds in the Transportation Trust Fund.

The amounts deposited into the Fund and the distribution and expenditure of such amounts shall not be used to calculate or reduce the share of federal, state, or local revenues otherwise available to participating localities. Further, such revenues and moneys shall not be included in any computation of, or formula for, a locality’s ability to pay for public education, upon which appropriations of state revenues to local governments for public education are determined.

History.

2013, c. 766, § 33.1-23.5:4; 2014, cc. 545, 678, 805; 2016, cc. 603, 608.

Editor’s note.

Former § 33.1-23.5:4, from which this section was derived, was enacted as § 33.1-23.5:3 by Acts 2013, c. 766, and subsequently renumbered at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2013, c. 766, cl. 9 provides: “That the Texas Transportation Institute’s annual report on highway congestion ranks the Northern Virginia/Washington, D.C. area as the worst area for traffic congestion in the nation, and the Hampton Roads region as the twentieth most congested area of the 101 areas studies. Such congestion has an average commuter cost of nearly $1,400 in Northern Virginia and $877 per commuter in Hampton Roads. Such congestion negatively impacts Virginia’s economic prosperity, strategic military connectivity, emergency preparedness, and environmental quality. Regions with populations in excess of 1.5 million citizens and 1.2 million registered vehicles are prone to greater levels of congestion and growing transit needs. Therefore, the General Assembly finds that transportation construction and maintenance in the Northern Virginia and Hampton Roads regions are high priorities, and that as other regions of the Commonwealth continue to grow, the same priority shall be given.”

Acts 2013, c. 766, cl. 10 provides: “That each county or city located in Planning District 8 or Planning District 23 as of January 1, 2013, shall expend or disburse for transportation purposes each year an amount that is at least equal to the average annual amount expended or disbursed for transportation purposes by the county or city, excluding bond proceeds or debt service payments and federal or state grants, between July 1, 2010, and June 30, 2013. Each county or city located in any other Planning District that becomes subject to the state taxes or fees imposed solely in Planning Districts pursuant to this act shall expend or disburse for transportation purposes each year an amount that is at least equal to the average annual amount expended or disbursed for transportation purposes by the county or city, excluding bond proceeds or debt service payments and federal or state grants, during the 36-month period immediately prior to the effective date of the imposition of such state taxes or fees in the Planning District. In the event that any such county or city does not expend or disburse such an amount, that county or city shall not be the direct beneficiary of any of the revenues generated by the state taxes or fees imposed solely in Planning Districts pursuant to this act in the immediately succeeding year.”

Acts 2014, cc. 545 and 678 amended § 33.1-23.5:4, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152,
the 2014 amendments by cc. 545 and 678 have been given effect in this section in the first paragraph by
substituting “highways” for “roads” in the sixth sentence, substituting “Accountability Commission” for “Planning Organization” in sixth and last sentences, and in the last sentence, inserting “for the greatest number of citizens residing within Planning District 23” and deleting “in all localities comprising Planning District 23” at the end.

Acts 2014, cc. 545 and 678, cl. 2 provides: “That the staff of the Hampton Roads Transportation Planning Organization and the Department of Transportation shall work cooperatively to assist the proper formation and effective organization of the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission. Until such time as the Commission is fully established and functioning, the staff of the Hampton Roads Transportation Planning Organization shall serve as its staff, and the Hampton Roads Transportation Planning Organization shall provide the Commission with office space and administrative support. The Commission shall reimburse the Hampton Roads Transportation Planning Organization for the cost of such staff, office space, and administrative support as appropriate.”

Acts 2014, c. 726, cl. 4 provides: “That the prioritization process developed pursuant to § 33.1-23.5:5 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall not apply to funds allocated to the Northern Virginia Transportation Authority Fund established pursuant to § 15.2-4838.01 of the Code of Virginia, the Hampton Roads Transportation Fund established pursuant to § 33.1-23.5:4 of the Code of Virginia, or federal funds subject to 23 U.S.C. 133(d)(1)(A)(i).”

Acts 2016, cc. 603 and 608, cl. 2 provides: “That no provision of this act shall result in the expiration of any provision of (i) Chapter 896 of the Acts of Assembly of 2007 pursuant to the 22nd enactment of that chapter or (ii) Chapter 766 of the Acts of Assembly of 2013 pursuant to the 14th enactment of that chapter.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 603 and 608 are identical, and inserted “(i),” “and (ii) administrative and operating expenses as specified in subsection B of

33.2-2605

”
and deleted “Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability” preceding “Commission shall give” in the first paragraph; inserted “and thereafter distributed to the Commission as soon as practicable for use in accordance with this chapter” and the last sentence in the second paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

State agency. —

The Commission is a state agency for purposes of State and Local Government Conflict of interests Act. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 14-076,
(2/6/15).

§ 33.2-2600.1.
Hampton Roads Regional Transit Program and Fund.

The General Assembly declares it to be in the public interest that developing and continuing operations of reliable regional public transportation is important for a balanced and effective multimodal transportation system in the Hampton Roads region and is essential to the region’s economic growth, vitality, and competitiveness. The General Assembly further declares that a special transportation program, to be known as the Hampton Roads Regional Transit Program (the Program), should provide for the costs of developing, maintaining, and improving a core regional network of transit routes and related infrastructure, rolling stock, and support facilities that have the greatest positive impacts on economic development potential, employment opportunities, mobility, environmental sustainability, and quality of life. The goal of the Program is to provide a modern, safe, and efficient core network of transit services across the Hampton Roads region. The Program shall be incorporated into strategic plans developed pursuant to §

33.2-286

and adopted by the governing board of each transit entity and shall form the basis for the regional transit planning process coordinated by the federally designated Metropolitan Planning Organization.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund for Planning District 23 to be known as the Hampton Roads Regional Transit Fund, referred to in this chapter as “the Regional Transit Fund.” The Regional Transit Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All revenues dedicated to the Regional Transit Fund pursuant to §§

58.1-802.5

,

58.1-816

, and

58.1-1743

shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Regional Transit Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Regional Transit Fund shall remain in the Regional Transit Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Regional Transit Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Regional Transit Fund.

The Regional Transit Fund shall be managed by the Commission, and disbursements from the Regional Transit Fund shall be approved by the Commission consistent with the regional transit planning process developed pursuant to subsection D of §

33.2-286

. The moneys deposited in the Regional Transit Fund shall be used solely for (i) the development, maintenance, improvement, and operation of a core and connected regional network of transit routes and related infrastructure, rolling stock, and support facilities, to include the operation of a regional system of interjurisdictional, high-frequency bus service, in a transportation district in Hampton Roads created pursuant to §

33.2-1903

as included in the strategic plans and regional transit planning process developed pursuant to §

33.2-286

and (ii) administrative and operating expenses of the Commission as specified in subsection B of §

33.2-2605

. In the allocation of funds, priority shall be given, when possible, to investments in the most sustainable and cost-effective operations, rolling stock, and facilities to reduce or eliminate reliance upon diesel fuels. Funds from the Regional Transit Fund shall not be used to support the expansion of light rail beyond the boundaries of a locality where light rail is operated on January 1, 2020. The amounts dedicated to the Regional Transit Fund shall be deposited monthly by the Comptroller into the Regional Transit Fund and thereafter distributed to the Commission as soon as practicable for use in accordance with this chapter. If the Commission determines that such moneys distributed to it exceed the amount required to meet the current needs and demands to fund transit projects pursuant to this chapter, the Commission may invest such excess moneys to the same extent and in the same manner as provided in subsection A of §

33.2-1525

for excess funds in the Transportation Trust Fund.

The amounts deposited into the Regional Transit Fund and the distribution and expenditure of such amounts shall not (i) be used to calculate or reduce the share of federal, state, or local revenues otherwise available to participating localities; (ii) allow a local government that is a member of the transportation district to reduce its local funding for public transportation purposes to an amount less than what was appropriated on July 1, 2019, for such purposes; or (iii) diminish or supplant allocations and appropriations from other sources or diminish allocations to which a transportation district, transit system, or locality would be entitled under any other provisions of law but shall supplement such funds to accelerate and augment transportation improvements in the Hampton Roads region. Further, such revenues and moneys shall not be included in any computation of, or formula for, a locality’s ability to pay for public education, upon which appropriations of state revenues to local governments for public education are determined. Any amounts paid from the Regional Transit Fund shall be considered local funds when used to make a required match for state or federal transportation grant funds.

History.

2020, cc. 1241, 1281.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1241 and 1281, cl. 3 provides: “That the Hampton Roads Transportation Planning Organization shall establish a regional transit advisory panel composed of representatives of major business and industry groups, employers, shopping destinations, institutions of higher education, military installations, hospitals and health care centers, public transit entities, and any other groups identified as necessary to provide ongoing advice to the regional planning process required pursuant to §

33.2-286

of the Code of Virginia on the long-term vision for a multimodal regional public transit network in Hampton Roads.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1241 and 1281, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of §

33.2-2604

of the Code of Virginia shall not apply to decisions of the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission (the Commission) regarding the disbursement of funds pursuant to §

33.2-2600.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act. The disbursement of funds pursuant to §

33.2-2600.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall require the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Commission subject to the taxes imposed pursuant to §

58.1-802.5

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-1743

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and the Commission shall not establish provisions that require the affirmative vote of any members of the Commission not subject to such taxes for the disbursement of funds pursuant to § 33.2-2600.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

§ 33.2-2601.
Commission created.

The Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission, referred to in this chapter as “the Commission,” is hereby created as a body politic and as a political subdivision of the Commonwealth. The Commission shall embrace each county and city located in Planning District 23, which is established pursuant to Chapter 42 (§

15.2-4200

et seq.) of Title 15.2.

History.

2014, cc. 545, 678.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 545 and 678 enacted Chapter 19 (§§ 33.1-466 through 33.1-476) of Title 33.1, from which this chapter is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2014, cc. 545 and 678 have been given effect as §§

33.2-2601

through

33.2-2611

.

Acts 2014, cc. 545 and 678, cl. 2 provides: “That the staff of the Hampton Roads Transportation Planning Organization and the Department of Transportation shall work cooperatively to assist the proper formation and effective organization of the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission. Until such time as the Commission is fully established and functioning, the staff of the Hampton Roads Transportation Planning Organization shall serve as its staff, and the Hampton Roads Transportation Planning Organization shall provide the Commission with office space and administrative support. The Commission shall reimburse the Hampton Roads Transportation Planning Organization for the cost of such staff, office space, and administrative support as appropriate.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1241 and 1281, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of §

33.2-2604

of the Code of Virginia shall not apply to decisions of the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission (the Commission) regarding the disbursement of funds pursuant to §

33.2-2600.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act. The disbursement of funds pursuant to §

33.2-2600.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall require the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Commission subject to the taxes imposed pursuant to §

58.1-802.5

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-1743

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and the Commission shall not establish provisions that require the affirmative vote of any members of the Commission not subject to such taxes for the disbursement of funds pursuant to § 33.2-2600.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

§ 33.2-2602.
Composition of Commission.

The Commission shall consist of 23 members as follows:

The chief elected officer of the governing body of each of the 10 cities embraced by the Commission;

A current elected official of each of the four counties embraced by the Commission, provided that such official (i) serves on the governing body of the county and (ii) has been appointed by resolution of such governing body to serve as the county’s member on the Commission;

Three members of the House of Delegates who reside in different counties or cities embraced by the Commission, appointed by the Speaker of the House, and two members of the Senate who reside in different counties or cities embraced by the Commission, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; and

The following four persons serving as nonvoting ex officio members of the Commission: a member of the Commonwealth Transportation Board who resides in a locality embraced by the Commission and is appointed by the Governor; the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, or his designee; the Commissioner of Highways, or his designee; and the Executive Director of the Virginia Port Authority, or his designee.All members of the Commission shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. If a member of the Commission who represents a locality as provided in subdivision 1 or 2 is unable to attend a meeting of the Commission, he may designate another current elected official of such governing body to attend a meeting of the Commission. Such designation shall be for the purposes of one meeting and shall be submitted in writing or electronically to the Chairman of the Commission at least 48 hours prior to the affected meeting.The Commission shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its voting membership.The Auditor of Public Accounts, or his legally authorized representatives, shall annually audit the financial accounts of the Commission, and the cost of such audit shall be borne by the Commission.

History.

2014, cc. 545, 678; 2016, cc. 603, 608.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 603 and 608, cl. 2 provides: “That no provision of this act shall result in the expiration of any provision of (i) Chapter 896 of the Acts of Assembly of 2007 pursuant to the 22nd enactment of that chapter or (ii) Chapter 766 of the Acts of Assembly of 2013 pursuant to the 14th enactment of that chapter.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 603 and 608 are identical, and in subdivision 1, substituted “10” for “14 counties and”; added subdivision 2 and renumbered subsequent subdivisions accordingly; and added the last two sentences in the paragraph following subdivision 4.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

If disqualifications under §

2.2-3112

of State and Local Government Conflict of interests Act leave the Commission with fewer than the number required to constitute a quorum,

the remaining voting members shall constitute a quorum and shall have authority to act by majority vote. If a quorum has been achieved, but disqualifications leave fewer than the number of chief elected officers sufficient to represent two-thirds of the population, the remaining voting members of the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission have the authority to act by majority vote, rather than overall two-thirds vote. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 14-076,
(2/6/15).

§ 33.2-2603.
Staff.

The Commission may employ a chief executive officer and such staff as it shall determine to be necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities under this chapter. No such person shall contemporaneously serve as a member of the Commission. The Department of Transportation and the Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall make their employees available to assist the Commission, upon request.

History.

2014, cc. 545, 678.

§ 33.2-2604.
Decisions of Commission.

A majority of the Commission, which majority shall include at least a majority of the total of chief elected officers and elected officials who represent the counties and cities embraced by the Commission, or their designees pursuant to §

33.2-2602

, shall constitute a quorum. Decisions of the Commission shall require a quorum and shall be in accordance with voting procedures established by the Commission. In all cases, decisions of the Commission shall require the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Commission, or their designees, present and voting, and two-thirds of the total of chief elected officers and elected officials who represent the counties and cities embraced by Planning District 23, or their designees, who are present and voting and whose counties and cities include at least two-thirds of the population embraced by the Commission; however, no motion to fund a specific facility or service shall fail because of this population criterion if such facility or service is not located or to be located or provided or to be provided within the county or city whose chief elected officer’s or elected official’s, or its respective designee’s, sole negative vote caused the facility or service to fail to meet the population criterion. The population of counties and cities embraced by the Commission shall be the population as determined by the most recently preceding decennial census, except that on July 1 of the fifth year following such census, the population of each county and city shall be adjusted, based on population estimates made by the Weldon Cooper Center for Public Service of the University of Virginia.

History.

2014, cc. 545, 678; 2015, c. 232; 2016, cc. 603, 608.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 603 and 608, cl. 2 provides: “That no provision of this act shall result in the expiration of any provision of (i) Chapter 896 of the Acts of Assembly of 2007 pursuant to the 22nd enactment of that chapter or (ii) Chapter 766 of the Acts of Assembly of 2013 pursuant to the 14th enactment of that chapter.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1241 and 1281, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of §

33.2-2604

of the Code of Virginia shall not apply to decisions of the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission (the Commission) regarding the disbursement of funds pursuant to §

33.2-2600.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act. The disbursement of funds pursuant to §

33.2-2600.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall require the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Commission subject to the taxes imposed pursuant to §

58.1-802.5

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-1743

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and the Commission shall not establish provisions that require the affirmative vote of any members of the Commission not subject to such taxes for the disbursement of funds pursuant to § 33.2-2600.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 232 substituted “population estimates” for “population projections” in the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 603 and 608 are identical, and inserted “total of,” substituted “and elected officials who represent” for “of” and inserted “or their designees pursuant to §

33.2-260

” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence twice inserted “or their designees” substituted “total of chief elected officers and elected officials who represent” for “chief elected officers of” and inserted “or elected official’s, or its respective designee’s.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

If disqualifications under §

2.2-3112

of State and Local Government Conflict of interests Act leave the Commission with fewer than the number required to constitute a quorum,

the remaining voting members shall constitute a quorum and shall have authority to act by majority vote. If a quorum has been achieved, but disqualifications leave fewer than the number of chief elected officers sufficient to represent two-thirds of the population, the remaining voting members of the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission have the authority to act by majority vote, rather than overall two-thirds vote. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 14-076,
(2/6/15).

§ 33.2-2605.
Annual budget and allocation of expenses.

The Commission shall adopt an annual budget and develop a funding plan and shall provide for such adoption in its bylaws. The funding plan shall provide for the expenditure of funds over a four- to six-year period and shall align with the Statewide Transportation Plan established pursuant to §

33.2-353

as much as possible. The Commission shall solicit public comment on its budget and funding plan by posting a summary of such budget and funding plan on its website and holding a public hearing. Such public hearing shall be advertised on the Commission’s website and in a newspaper of general circulation in Planning District 23.

The administrative and operating expenses of the Commission shall be provided in an annual budget adopted by the Commission. To the extent that funds for such expenses are not provided from other sources, the expenses shall be paid from the Fund and the Regional Transit Fund on an approximately pro rata basis of the programs supported by the Fund and the Regional Transit Fund. Such budget shall be limited solely to the administrative and operating expenses of the Commission and shall not include any funds for construction or acquisition of transportation facilities or the performance of any transportation service.

Members may be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

, if approved by the Commission. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Commission.

History.

2014, cc. 545, 678; 2016, cc. 603, 608; 2020, cc. 1241, 1281.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 603 and 608, cl. 2 provides: “That no provision of this act shall result in the expiration of any provision of (i) Chapter 896 of the Acts of Assembly of 2007 pursuant to the 22nd enactment of that chapter or (ii) Chapter 766 of the Acts of Assembly of 2013 pursuant to the 14th enactment of that chapter.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1241 and 1281, cl. 3 provides: “That the Hampton Roads Transportation Planning Organization shall establish a regional transit advisory panel composed of representatives of major business and industry groups, employers, shopping destinations, institutions of higher education, military installations, hospitals and health care centers, public transit entities, and any other groups identified as necessary to provide ongoing advice to the regional planning process required pursuant to §

33.2-286

of the Code of Virginia on the long-term vision for a multimodal regional public transit network in Hampton Roads.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1241 and 1281, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of §

33.2-2604

of the Code of Virginia shall not apply to decisions of the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission (the Commission) regarding the disbursement of funds pursuant to §

33.2-2600.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act. The disbursement of funds pursuant to §

33.2-2600.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall require the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Commission subject to the taxes imposed pursuant to §

58.1-802.5

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-1743

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and the Commission shall not establish provisions that require the affirmative vote of any members of the Commission not subject to such taxes for the disbursement of funds pursuant to § 33.2-2600.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 603 and 608 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “and operating”; and substituted “shall be” for “as,” and “paid from the Fund” for “allocated among the component counties and cities on the basis of the relative population as determined pursuant to §

33.2-2604

.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1241 and 1281 are identical, and substituted “by the Commission. To the extent that funds for such expenses are not provided from other sources, the expenses shall be paid from the Fund and the Regional Transit Fund on an approximately pro rata basis of the programs supported by the Fund and the Regional Transit Fund” for “by the Commission and to the extent funds for such expenses are not provided from other sources shall be paid from the Fund” in subsection B in the first two sentences.

§ 33.2-2606.
Authority to issue bonds.

The Commission may issue bonds and other evidences of debt as may be authorized by this section or other law. The provisions of Article 5 (§

33.2-1920

et seq) of Chapter 19 shall apply, mutatis mutandis, to the issuance of such bonds or other debt. The Commission may issue bonds or other debt in such amounts as it deems appropriate. The bonds may be supported by any funds available, except that funds from tolls collected pursuant to §

33.2-2607

shall be used only as provided in that section.

History.

2014, cc. 545, 678.

§ 33.2-2607.
Powers of the Commission.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this title and in accordance with all applicable federal statutes and requirements, the Commission shall control and operate and may impose and collect tolls in amounts established by the Commission for the use of any new or improved highway, bridge, or tunnel, to increase capacity on such facility or to address congestion within Planning District 23, constructed by the Commission (i) with federal, state, or local funds, (ii) solely with revenues of the Commission, or (iii) with revenues under the control of the Commission. The amount of any such toll may be varied from facility to facility, by lane, by congestion levels, by day of the week, by time of day, by type or size of vehicle, by number of axles, or by any similar combination thereof or any other factor the Commission may deem proper, and a reduced rate may be established for commuters as defined by the Commission. All such tolls shall be used for programs and projects that are reasonably related to or benefit the users of the new or improved highway, bridge, or tunnel, including, but not limited to, for the debt service and other costs of bonds whose proceeds are used for construction or improvement of such highway, bridge, or tunnel.

Any tolls imposed by the Commission shall be collected by an electronic toll system that, to the extent possible, shall not impede the traffic flow of the facility or prohibit a toll facility from retaining means of nonautomated toll collection in some lanes of the facility. For all facilities tolled by the Commission, there shall be signs erected prior to the point of toll collection that clearly state how the majority of the toll revenue is being spent by the Commission to benefit the users of the facility.

History.

2014, cc. 545, 678.

§ 33.2-2608.
Additional powers of the Commission.

The Commission shall have the following powers together with all powers incidental thereto or necessary for the performance of those hereinafter stated:

To sue and be sued and to prosecute and defend, at law or in equity, in any court having jurisdiction of the subject matter and of the parties;

To adopt and use a corporate seal and to alter the same at its pleasure;

To procure insurance, participate in insurance plans, and provide self-insurance; however, the purchase of insurance, participation in an insurance plan, or the creation of a self-insurance plan by the Commission shall not be deemed a waiver or relinquishment of any sovereign immunity to which the Commission or its officers, directors, employees, or agents are otherwise entitled;

To establish bylaws and make all rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, deemed expedient for the management of the Commission’s affairs;

To apply for and accept money, materials, contributions, grants, or other financial assistance from the United States and agencies or instrumentalities thereof; the Commonwealth; and any political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of the Commonwealth; and from any legitimate private source;

To acquire real and personal property or any interest therein by purchase, lease, gift, or otherwise for purposes consistent with this chapter and to hold, encumber, sell, or otherwise dispose of such land or interest for purposes consistent with this chapter;

To acquire by purchase, lease, contract, or otherwise, highways, bridges, or tunnels and to construct the same by purchase, lease, contract, or otherwise;

In consultation with the Commonwealth Transportation Board and with each city or county in which the facility or any part thereof is or is to be located, to repair, expand, enlarge, construct, reconstruct, or renovate any or all highways, bridges, and tunnels within Planning District 23 and to acquire any real or personal property needed for any such purpose;

To enter into agreements or leases with public or private entities for the operation and maintenance of bridges, tunnels, transit and rail facilities, and highways;

To make and execute contracts, deeds, mortgages, leases, and all other instruments and agreements necessary or convenient for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers and functions under this chapter;

To the extent funds are made or become available to the Commission to do so, to employ employees, agents, advisors, and consultants, including without limitation attorneys, financial advisers, engineers, and other technical advisers and, the provisions of any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, to determine their duties and compensation; and

To the extent not inconsistent with the other provisions of this chapter, and without limiting or restricting the powers otherwise given the Commission, to exercise all of the powers given to transportation district commissions by §

33.2-1919

.

The Commission shall comply with the provisions governing localities contained in §

15.2-2108.23

.

History.

2014, cc. 545, 678.

§ 33.2-2609.
Commission a responsible public entity under Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995.

The Commission is a responsible public entity as defined in §

33.2-1800

and shall be regulated in accordance with the terms of the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq.) and regulations and guidelines adopted pursuant thereto.

History.

2014, cc. 545, 678.

§ 33.2-2610.
Continuing responsibilities of the Commonwealth Transportation Board and the Department of Transportation.

Except as otherwise explicitly provided in this chapter, until such time as the Commission and the Department of Transportation, or the Commission and the Commonwealth Transportation Board, agree otherwise in writing, the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall allocate funding to and the Department of Transportation shall perform or cause to be performed all maintenance and operation of the bridges, tunnels, and roadways and shall perform such other required services and activities with respect to such bridges, tunnels, and roadways as were being performed on July 1, 2014.

History.

2014, cc. 545, 678.

§ 33.2-2611.
Use of revenues by the Commission.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, all moneys received by the Commission shall be used by the Commission solely for the benefit of those counties and cities that are embraced by the Commission, and such moneys shall be used by the Commission in a manner that is consistent with the purposes stated in this chapter.

History.

2014, cc. 545, 678.

§ 33.2-2612.
Additional tolling authority of the Commission.

For the purposes of this section, “the facility” means the vicinity of the interchange of Interstate 64 and Jefferson Avenue to the interchange of Interstate 64, Interstate 264, and Interstate 664.

The Commission shall, subject to the conditions provided in this section, have the authority to impose and collect tolls on high-occupancy toll lanes on Interstate 64 in the facility. The tolls shall be collected by an electronic toll system that, to the extent possible, shall not impede the traffic flow of the facility. The tolls authorized by this section may only be imposed on a portion of the facility that has been designated as high-occupancy toll lanes by the Board pursuant to §

33.2-502

, and the amount of the tolls shall be varied by congestion level. All such tolls may be used for programs and projects that are reasonably related to or that benefit users of the facility and, without limiting the foregoing, may be used to pay the debt service on and related reserves and financing costs for, and pledged to support, bonds and other evidences of indebtedness the proceeds of which are or were used for construction or improvement of the facility.

Prior to the imposition of tolls pursuant to this section, the Commission shall enter into an agreement with the Board and the Department that (i) sets the standards for the operations of the facility, including the collection of tolls; (ii) addresses the use and application of toll revenues and toll-backed debt proceeds and the reimbursement of any funds expended by the Board or the Department to convert any portion of the facility from high-occupancy vehicle lanes to high-occupancy toll lanes, as these terms are defined in §

33.2-500

; and (iii) contains such other provisions deemed appropriate and necessary to ensure the safe and efficient operations of the general purpose and high-occupancy toll lanes on any portion of the facility where the Commission intends to exercise the authority provided in subsection B.

History.

2020, c. 703.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 703 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.